Utah statutes.
13-14-106.   Administrative proceedings commenced by the agency.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), after a hearing and after receipt of the advisory board's recommendation, if the executive director finds that a person has violated this chapter or any rule made under this chapter, the executive director may:

(a)  issue a cease and desist order; and

(b)  assess an administrative fine.

(2) (a)  In determining the amount and appropriateness of an administrative fine under Subsection (1), the executive director shall consider:

(i)  the gravity of the violation;

(ii)  any history of previous violations; and

(iii)  any attempt made by the person to retaliate against another person for seeking relief under this chapter or other federal or state law relating to the motor vehicle industry.

(b)  In addition to any other action permitted under Subsection (1), the department may file an action with a court seeking to enforce the executive director's order and pursue the executive director's assessment of a fine in an amount not to exceed $5,000 for each day a person violates an order of the executive director.

(3) (a)  In addition to the grounds for issuing an order on an emergency basis listed in Subsection 63G-4-502(1), the executive director may issue an order on an emergency basis if the executive director determines that irreparable damage is likely to occur if immediate action is not taken.

(b)  In issuing an emergency order under Subsection (3)(a) the executive director shall comply with the requirements of Subsections 63G-4-502(2) and (3).



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

